Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.310

Expense of keeping jury.

If, while the jury are kept together, either during the progress of the trial or after their retirement for deliberation, the court orders them to be provided with suitable and sufficient food and lodging, they shall be so provided at the expense of the county.

[ 2003 c 406 s 18; Code 1881 s 230; 1877 p 48 s 234; 1869 p 57 s 234; RRS s 350.]